Utah statutes.
53A-17a-156.   Teacher Salary Supplement Program.
(1)  As used in this section:
(a)  "Eligible teacher" means a teacher who:
(i)  has an assignment to teach:
(A)  a secondary school level mathematics course;
(B)  integrated science in grade 7 or 8;
(C)  chemistry; or
(D)  physics;
(ii)  holds the appropriate endorsement for the assigned course;
(iii)  has qualifying educational background; and
(iv) (A)  is a new employee; or
(B)  received a satisfactory rating or above on the teacher's most recent
evaluation.
(b)  "Qualifying educational background" means:
(i)  for a teacher who is assigned a secondary school level mathematics
course, a bachelor's degree major, master's degree, or doctoral degree in
mathematics; and
(ii)  for a teacher who is assigned a grade 7 or 8 integrated science course,
chemistry course, or physics course, a bachelor's degree major, master's
degree, or doctoral degree in:
(I)  integrated science;
(II)  chemistry;
(III)  physics;
(IV)  physical science; or
(V)  general science.
(2) (a)  Subject to future budget constraints, the Legislature shall annually
appropriate money to the Teacher Salary Supplement Restricted Account
established in Section 53A-17a-157 to fund the Teacher Salary Supplement
Program.
(b)  Money appropriated for the Teacher Salary Supplement Program shall
include money for the following employer-paid benefits:
(i)  retirement;
(ii)  workers' compensation;
(iii)  Social Security; and
(iv)  Medicare.
(3) (a)  Beginning in fiscal year 2008-09, the annual salary supplement is
$4,100 for an eligible teacher who:
(i)  is assigned full-time to teach one or more courses listed in Subsections
(1)(a)(i)(A) through (D); and
(ii)  meets the requirements of Subsections (1)(a)(ii) and (iii) for each
course assignment.
(b)  An eligible teacher who has a part-time assignment to teach one or more
courses listed in Subsections (1)(a)(i)(A) through (D) shall receive a partial
salary supplement based on the number of hours worked in a course assignment
that meets the requirements of Subsections (1)(a)(ii) and (iii).
(4)  The Department of Human Resource Management shall:
(a)  create an on-line application system for a teacher to apply to receive a
salary supplement through the Teacher Salary Supplement Program;
(b)  determine if a teacher:
(i)  is an eligible teacher; and
(ii)  has a course assignment as listed in Subsections (1)(a)(i)(A) through
(D);
(c)  verify, as needed, the determinations made under Subsection (4)(b) with
school district and school administrators; and
(d)  certify a list of eligible teachers and the amount of their salary
supplement, sorted by school district and charter school, to the Division of
Finance.
(5) (a)  An eligible teacher shall apply with the Department of Human Resource
Management prior to the conclusion of a school year to receive the salary
supplement authorized in this section.
(b)  An eligible teacher may apply with the Department of Human Resource
Management, after verification that the requirements under this section have
been satisfied, to receive a salary supplement after the completion of:
(i)  the school year as an annual award; or
(ii)  a semester or trimester as a partial award based on the portion of the
school year that has been completed.
(6) (a)  The Division of Finance shall distribute monies from the Teacher
Salary Supplement Restricted Account to school districts and charter schools
for the Teacher Salary Supplement Program in accordance with the provisions of
this section.
(b)  The Department of Human Resource Management shall include the employer-
paid benefits described under Subsection (2)(b) in the amount of each salary
supplement certified to the Division of Finance.
(c)  The employer-paid benefits described under Subsection (2)(b) are an
addition to the salary supplement limits described under Subsection (3).
(7) (a)  Money received from the Teacher Salary Supplement Restricted Account
shall be used by a school district or charter school to provide a salary
supplement equal to the amount specified for each eligible teacher.
(b)  The salary supplement is part of the teacher's base pay, subject to the
teacher's qualification as an eligible teacher every year, semester, or
trimester.
(8)  The State Board of Education shall cooperate with the Department of Human
Resource Management as it administers the Teacher Salary Supplement Program
by:
(a)  providing or verifying teacher data, as requested; and
(b)  making information technology resources available.
(9)  Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, if the appropriation for
the program is insufficient to cover the costs associated with salary
supplements, the Department of Human Resource Management may limit or reduce
the salary supplements.
